Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-316
Pickle card operator, defined.

Pickle card operator shall mean any sole proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation which sells individual pickle cards on behalf of the licensed organization.

Laws 1985, LB 408, § 9;

R.S.Supp.,1985, § 9-140.14;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 82;

Laws 1988, LB 1232, § 14;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 109.